Utah statutes.
31A-22-1407.   Restricted conditional terms.
(1)  A long-term care insurance policy may not contain a provision that
conditions eligibility:
(a) for any benefits on a prior hospitalization requirement;
(b) for benefits provided in an institutional care setting on the receipt of a
higher level of institutional care; or
(c)  for any benefits on a prior institutionalization requirement except for
eligibility for:
(i)  waiver of premium;
(ii)  post confinement;
(iii)  post-acute care; or
(iv)  recuperative benefits.
(2)  A long-term care insurance policy containing post confinement, post-acute
care, or recuperative benefits shall clearly label the limitations or
conditions, including any required number of days of confinement in a separate
paragraph of the policy or certificate that is entitled "Limitations or
Conditions on Eligibility for Benefits."
(3)  A long-term care insurance policy or rider that conditions eligibility of
noninstitutional benefits on the prior receipt of institutional care may not
require a prior institutional stay of more than 30 days.
